Maryland, session 2026, HB1274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1274*

HOUSE BILL 1274
Article – Education
7–205.
(c) (1) Each student who graduates from a public high school shall receive the
same type of diploma or certificate, regardless of the high school attended or the course
taken.
(2) The diploma or certificate shall state that the student has completed a
program of studies satisfactorily in accordance with the requirements of the State Board.
7–206.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “IN MEMORIAM DIPLOMA” MEANS A CEREMONIAL DIPLOMA
RECOGNIZING A STUDENT’S ENROLLMENT AND MEMBERSHIP IN THE SCHOOL
COMMUNITY.
(3) “POSTHUMOUS HONORARY DIPLOMA” MEANS A CEREMONIAL
DIPLOMA HONORING A STUDENT ENROLLED IN SECONDARY EDUCATION.
(4) “STANDARD HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA” MEANS THE DIPLOMA OR
CERTIFICATE AWARDED TO A STUDENT UNDER § 7–205 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM MAY AWARD A STANDARD HIGH SCHOOL
DIPLOMA POSTHUMOUSLY TO A DECEASED STUDENT WHO WAS, AT THE TIME OF THE
STUDENT’S DEATH:
(1) A RESIDENT OF THE COUNTY;
(2) ENROLLED IN GRADE 12 IN A PUBLIC SCHOOL;
(3) WITHIN A CERTAIN NUMBER OF CREDITS FROM COMPLETING THE
CREDITS REQUIRED FOR GRADUATION; AND
(4) IN GOOD ACADEMIC STANDING.
(C) A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM MAY AWARD A POSTHUMOUS HONORARY
DIPLOMA TO A DECEASED STUDENT WHO WAS, AT THE TIME OF THE STUDENT’S
DEATH:
(1) A RESIDENT OF THE COUNTY;

HOUSE BILL 1274 3
(2) ENROLLED IN GRADE 11 OR 12 IN A PUBLIC SCHOOL; AND
(3) WITHIN A CERTAIN NUMBER OF CREDITS FROM COMPLETING THE
CREDITS REQUIRED FOR GRADUATION.
(D) A SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A LOCAL SCHOOL
SYSTEM MAY SHALL AWARD AN IN MEMORIAM A POSTHUMOUS HONORARY DIPLOMA
TO A DECEASED STUDENT WHO WAS, AT THE TIME OF THE STUDENT’S DEATH:
(1) A RESIDENT OF THE COUNTY; OR
(2) ENROLLED, ENROLLED IN ANY GRADE FROM KINDERGARTEN
THROUGH GRADE 10 12 IN A PUBLIC SCHOOL.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL DETERMINE THE NUMBER OF CREDITS A STUDENT IS
REQUIRED TO COMPLETE TO BE AWARDED:
(I) A STANDARD HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA UNDER SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) A POSTHUMOUS HONORARY DIPLOMA UNDER SUBSECTION
(C) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE NUMBER OF CREDITS A STUDENT IS REQUIRED TO COMPLETE
TO BE AWARDED A STANDARD HIGH SCHOOL DIPLOMA SHALL BE SIGNIFICANTLY
HIGHER THAN THE NUMBER OF CREDITS REQUIRED FOR A POSTHUMOUS HONORARY
DIPLOMA.
(F) (B) A LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM SHALL AWARD A DIPLOMA UNDER THIS
SECTION ONLY ON WRITTEN REQUEST OF:
(1) A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN OF THE DECEASED STUDENT; OR
(2) IF THERE IS NO SURVIVING PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN, THE
DECEASED STUDENT’S NEXT OF KIN.
(G) (C) (1) EXCEPT FOR A DIPLOMA AWARDED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)
OF THIS SECTION, A A DIPLOMA AWARDED UNDER THIS SECTION IS CEREMONIAL IN
NATURE AND DOES NOT CONFER LEGAL RIGHTS OR STANDARDS ASSOCIATED WITH
ACADEMIC COMPLETION.

HOUSE BILL 1274
(2) THE AWARDING OF ANY DIPLOMA UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT
BE INCLUDED IN THE COMPUTATION OF GRADUATION RATES MAINTAINED BY THE
COUNTY BOARD OR THE DEPARTMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.